test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-piaggalm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - piäg´gálm: # 1B
    piäg´gálm+N+Sg+Nom: piäg´gálm
    piäg´gálm+N+Sg+Gen: piäg´gálm
    piäg´gálm+N+Sg+Acc: piäg´gálm
    piäg´gálm+N+Sg+Ill: piä´gálmân
    piäg´gálm+N+Sg+Loc: piä´gálmist
    piäg´gálm+N+Sg+Com: piä´gálmáin
    piäg´gálm+N+Sg+Abe: piäg´gálmttáá
    piäg´gálm+N+Ess:    piä´gálmin
    piäg´gálm+N+Par:    piä´gálmid
    piäg´gálm+N+Pl+Nom: piä´gálmeh
    piäg´gálm+N+Pl+Gen: piä´gálmij
    piäg´gálm+N+Pl+Acc: piä´gálmijd
    piäg´gálm+N+Pl+Ill: piä´gálmáid
    piäg´gálm+N+Pl+Loc: piä´gálmijn
    piäg´gálm+N+Pl+Com: piä´gálmijguin
    piäg´gálm+N+Pl+Abe: piä´gálmijttáá
